South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3923.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created the "High Speed Pursuit Alternative Study Committee" to examine the feasibility of equipping South Carolina Highway Patrol Vehicles with launcher devices that propel GPS tracking gadgets that attach themselves onto a criminal suspect's vehicle. (B) The study committee must be comprised of three members of the Senate appointed by the Chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, three members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, and the Director of the Department of Public Safety. Members of the Senate and the House of Representatives with the greatest seniority in their respective bodies shall serve as co-chairs of the study committee. (C) The Chairmen of the Senate Judiciary and House Judiciary committees shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. (D) The study committee shall make a report of its recommendation to the General Assembly within six months of the effective date of this joint resolution, at which time the study committee is dissolved. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----